Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BASE YEAR FORMULA AID FOR THE CITY OF BALDWIN.new text end new text begin For the calculation under Minnesota Statutes, section 477A.013, subdivisions 8 and 9, for aids payable in 2026, the city of Baldwin's aid for 2025, used in calculating aid payable in 2026, is deemed to be equal to $....... multiplied by the city's population. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for aids payable in 2026 only. new text end